Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-2,104
Chief Water Officer's order; not subject to collateral attack.

If an action is commenced pursuant to section 46-2,102 or 46-2,103, an order of the Chief Water Officer identifying water stored or to be stored underground, or approving fees or assessments, may not be collaterally attacked.

Laws 1983, LB 198, § 18;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 121.